Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.04.097

Minor political party.

"Minor political party" means a political organization other than a major political party.

[ 2003 c 111 s 116. Prior: 1965 c 9 s 29.01.100; prior: 1955 c 102 s 8; prior: 1907 c 209 s 26, part; RRS s 5203, part. Formerly RCW 29.01.100.]

NOTES:

Minor party convention: RCW 29A.56.600 through 29A.56.670.

Political parties: Chapter 29A.80 RCW.